Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 6 Capitol Police Division

35-2-120.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Capitol Square” means that area designated as such by Code Section 50-2-28.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of public safety.

“Department” means the Department of Public Safety.

“Division” means the Capitol Police Division of the department created by this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-120

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 137, § 1/HB 1074.

Cross references.

Appointment of nonuniformed investigators to protect state property, §

35-1-6

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law on administrative law, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2010).

35-2-121.
Establishment of Capitol Police Division; staffing.

There is created and established a division of the Department of Public Safety to be known as the Capitol Police Division. The department shall staff such division with certified law enforcement officers, who shall be designated capitol police officers, security personnel under the employment of or contract with the department, and any other certified peace officer employed by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-121

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 137, § 1/HB 1074.

35-2-122.
Jurisdiction; duties; power.

The division shall have jurisdiction and the primary duty to enforce all laws in Capitol Square and the property and buildings owned by the Georgia Building Authority within a five-mile radius of Capitol Square.

The division shall have the following additional duties:

To maintain peace and order and enforce the laws and regulations relating to controlling access to any building or property under the control or operation of the Georgia Building Authority;

To maintain peace and order and enforce the laws and regulations relating to controlling access to Capitol Square;

To enforce parking and traffic laws and to investigate accidents within Capitol Square;

To enforce state law when ordered to do so by the commissioner; and

To exercise the powers of a law enforcement officer to protect life and property.

In the performance of their duties, certified law enforcement officers shall be authorized to carry firearms and exercise the power of arrest.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-122

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 137, § 1/HB 1074.

35-2-123.
[Reserved] Use of vehicles by off-duty law enforcement officer.

History.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 137, § 1/HB 1074; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 385, § 6/HB 806, effective April 26, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 385, § 6/HB 806 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 26, 2016.

35-2-124.
Reimbursement to the department for costs.

The Georgia Building Authority shall reimburse the department for the costs to the department of performing police and security duties within Capitol Square in accordance with an intergovernmental agreement by and between the department and the Georgia Building Authority. Such agreement shall set forth the amount to be paid by the Georgia Building Authority to the department for each fiscal year and shall be executed prior to the budget submission deadline set by the Office of Planning and Budget.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-124

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 137, § 1/HB 1074; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 35/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted “Governor’s” preceding “Office of Planning and Budget” near the end of the last sentence.